Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.006

Washington technology solutions—Purpose.

To achieve maximum benefit from advances in information technology the state establishes a centralized provider and procurer of certain information technology services as an agency to support the needs of state agencies. This agency shall be known as Washington technology solutions. To ensure maximum benefit to the state, state agencies shall rely on Washington technology solutions for those services with a business case of broad use, uniformity, scalability, and price sensitivity to aggregation and volume. The agency shall also establish clear policies and standards for efficient and acceptable use of technology in state government, providing guidance and leadership to state agencies in deploying technology to meet their business objectives.

To successfully meet agency needs and meet its obligation as the primary service provider for these services, Washington technology solutions must offer high quality services at the lowest possible price. It must be able to attract an adaptable and competitive workforce, be authorized to procure services where the business case justifies it, create policy and standards to address changes in the technology industry, and be accountable to its customers for the efficient and effective delivery of critical business services.

Washington technology solutions is established as an agency in state government. The agency is established with clear accountability to the agencies it serves and to the public. This accountability will come through enhanced transparency in the agency's operation and performance. The agency is also established with broad flexibility to adapt its operations, policies and standards, and service catalog to address the needs of customer agencies, and to do so in the most cost-effective ways.

[ 2024 c 54 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 801.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.